Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF120.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 6 TLSB 2307YH (2) 91 jda/jh H.F. 120 Section 1. Section 279.10, subsection 2, unnumbered 1 paragraph 1, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 The board of directors of a school district and the 3 authorities in charge of an accredited nonpublic school may 4 apply to the department of education for authorization to 5 maintain a year-round school calendar at an attendance center 6 or school for students in prekindergarten through grade 7 eight twelve . However, a board shall hold a public hearing 8 on any proposal relating to authorization for a year-round 9 school calendar prior to submitting an application under this 10 subsection to the department of education for approval. 11